Utah statutes.
53A-9-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Career ladder" means a compensation system developed by a school district, with advice and counsel from parents, teachers, and school administrators who represent the various schools throughout the district, which is in accordance with provisions of this chapter and applicable policies and guidelines adopted by the State Board of Education.

(2)  "Educator" or "teacher" means certified personnel who are paid on the teacher's salary schedule and whose primary function is to provide instructional or a combination of instructional and counseling services to students in the public schools.

(3)  "Evaluation system" means the educator evaluation program developed under Title 53A, Chapter 10, Educator Evaluation.

